Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
Motor Vehicle Licenses
186.210.
False statements in applications prohibited — Possession of plates and receipts.

No person shall make any false statement in an application for registration, application for duplicate receipt or plate, bill of sale, registration receipt, motor number or vehicle identification number. No person shall use, display or keep registration plates or registration receipts that do not belong or have not been issued to him. This subsection shall not apply to a false statement in an initial or renewal application for a military license plate issued under KRS

186.041

.

No person shall make any false statement in an initial or renewal application for a military license plate issued under KRS

186.041

or use, display, or keep military license plates that do not belong or have not been issued to him.

The penalties established in KRS

186.990

for violations of this section shall be printed prominently on every form or blank used for these purposes and furnished by the cabinet.

History.

2739g-22: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 153, § 6; 1958, ch. 82, § 8; 1976, ch. 133, § 12; 1978, ch. 239, § 15, effective June 17, 1978; 2008, ch. 15, § 2, effective July 15, 2008.

186.220.
Denial and revocation of registration for violation of laws. [Repealed.]

186.230.
County clerk’s duties — Lien on vehicle, effect — Issuance of plate without collecting taxes and fees prohibited.

The county clerk shall see that KRS

186.005

to

186.260

in his county are enforced. In so doing, he shall:

Take all applications as provided in KRS

186.005

to

186.260

;

Issue the receipts on blanks furnished by the cabinet;

Collect the fees due the state;

Distribute the registration plates furnished by the Transportation Cabinet and Department of Vehicle Regulation and keep a complete public record of all registrations for his county, in his office;

Report and remit each Monday to the Transportation Cabinet all moneys collected during the previous week, together with a duplicate of all receipts issued by him during the same period. He shall make all checks payable to the State Treasurer. Unless the clerk forwards duplicates of all receipts issued by him during the reporting period with his report and remits the amount shown due by the report within seven (7) days after the report and remittance are due, he shall pay a penalty of one percent (1%) per month or fraction thereof on the amount of money shown to be due on the report. The cabinet may in its discretion grant a county clerk a reasonable extension of time to file his report and remit all moneys not to exceed ten (10) days for any one (1) report. The extension however must be requested prior to the end of the seven (7) day period and shall begin to run at the end of said period. All penalties collected under this provision shall be paid into the State Treasury as a part of the revenue collected under KRS

186.005

to

186.260

;

The clerk shall mail to the Transportation Cabinet one (1) duplicate of all receipts issued by him within two (2) weeks of the date of issuance. The Transportation Cabinet shall make the receipts pertaining to commercial vehicles available to the Department of Vehicle Regulation for use in assimilating data therefrom;

Account to the Transportation Cabinet for all registration plates and receipt forms consigned to him, at such time or times as the Transportation Cabinet may direct, and give the appropriate cabinet timely notice of a probable deficiency of plates or other supplies;

Any county clerk, who in collecting the taxes and fees due the state or county clerk, accepts in payment thereof a check which is not honored upon presentment, shall have a lien on the vehicle for the amount of such check. This lien shall be subordinate to any prior perfected lien, either contractual or statutory;

No person shall be permitted to sell, trade or transfer ownership of a motor vehicle if evidence is presented to the county clerk that any lien exists on the motor vehicle; and

The county clerk shall not issue to any manufacturer or dealer any registration plate other than a manufacturer’s or dealer’s plate, or registration plate which is under a dealer assignment pursuant to KRS

186A.230

, except when the dealer registers a motor vehicle under a U-Drive-It permit, without collecting designated registration fees and applicable taxes.

History.

2739g-62, 2739g-63: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 78, § 11; 1960, ch. 37, § 3; 1962, ch. 62, § 14; 1964, ch. 59, § 3; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(2), (7), (9); 1976, ch. 133, § 13; 1978, ch. 239, § 16, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 431, § 13, effective July 15, 1986.

186.232.
Registration not transferable until taxes paid, lien released, and proof of insurance and notarized affidavit presented.

The county clerk shall not transfer the registration on any motor vehicle or trailer against which a tax lien has been filed until the taxes have been paid and the lien has been released.

The county clerk shall not transfer the registration of any motor vehicle unless the transferee presents proof of insurance in compliance with KRS

304.39-080

and KRS

186.190

.

If a notarized affidavit is required and available under KRS

138.450

, the county clerk shall not transfer the registration of a motor vehicle unless the notarized affidavit attesting to the total and actual consideration paid or to be paid for the motor vehicle is presented to the clerk at the time of the transfer. If a notarized affidavit is required but is not available, the county clerk shall contact the Department of Revenue to determine the “retail price” of the vehicle and any taxes due prior to transferring the vehicle.

The county clerk shall not transfer title on a motor vehicle if there are delinquent ad valorem taxes on the motor vehicle.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 240, § 3, effective July 15, 1980; 1994, ch. 504, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 600, § 7, effective April 14, 1998; 2005, ch. 85, § 606, effective June 20, 2005; 2011, ch. 5, § 4, effective January 1, 2013.

186.235.
Inspection prior to registration. [Repealed.]

186.240.
Cabinet to furnish forms and plates — Records — Receipts — Reflectorized license plate program fund — Use of receipts — Accounting by clerk — Audit. [Effective until January 1, 2024]

It shall be the duty of the cabinet to carry out the provisions of KRS

186.005

to

186.260

, and:

Provide to the clerk in each county access to all forms provided for in KRS

186.005

to

186.260

;

Keep a numerical record of all registration numbers issued in the state and also keep a record of motor or vehicle identification numbers required by KRS

186.160

; and

Furnish to each clerk, originally each year upon estimate, and thereafter upon requisition at all times, a sufficient supply of standard, noncommercial plates and the supplies necessary to provide evidence of registration for all classes of vehicles required to be registered.

Prescribe a plate of practical form and size for police identification purposes that shall contain:

The registration identifier;

An indication that Kentucky is the issuing jurisdiction;

For standard plates for noncommercial vehicles, the county in which the plate is issued;

For plates for commercial vehicles, the year the license expires and words or information the Department of Vehicle Regulation may prescribe by administrative regulation, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A; and

At the discretion of the cabinet, a state slogan.

License plates issued pursuant to this chapter shall conform to the provisions of subsection (1)(c) and (d) of this section.The Transportation Cabinet shall provide for the issuance of reflectorized plates for all motor vehicles, and shall collect a fee, in addition to the fee set out in KRS Chapter 186 and KRS

281.631

, of fifty cents ($0.50). The fifty cents ($0.50) fee to reflectorize license plates shall be used by the cabinet as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

The reflectorized license plate program fund is established in the state road fund and appropriated on a continual basis to the cabinet to administer the moneys as provided in this subsection. The fifty cents ($0.50) fee collected by the cabinet to reflectorize license plates shall be deposited into the program fund and used to issue reflectorized license plates. If at the end of a fiscal year, money remains in the program fund, it shall be retained in the fund and shall not revert to the state road fund. The interest and income earned on money in the program fund shall also be retained in the program fund to carry out the provisions of this subsection. The Transportation Cabinet shall issue reflectorized license plates under the provisions of this subsection on a schedule to be determined at the discretion of the cabinet.

Except as directed under subsection (3) of this section, the Transportation Cabinet shall receive all moneys forwarded by the clerk in each county and turn it over to the State Treasurer for the benefit of the state road fund.

The Transportation Cabinet shall require an accounting by the clerk in each county for any moneys received by him under the provisions of this chapter, after the deduction of his fees under this chapter, and for all receipts, forms, plates, and insignia consigned to him. The Auditor of Public Accounts, pursuant to KRS

43.071

, shall annually audit each county clerk concerning his responsibilities for the collection of various fees and taxes associated with motor vehicles. The secretary of the Transportation Cabinet, with the advice, consultation, and approval of the Auditor, shall develop and implement an inventory and accounting system which shall insure that the audits mandated in KRS

43.071

are performed in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards. The Transportation Cabinet shall pay for the audits mandated by KRS 43.071.

When applied for under KRS

186.060

or

186.061

, motor or vehicle numbers assigned shall be distinctive to show that they were designated by the cabinet.

History.

2739g-63: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 78, §§ 6, 11; 1946, ch. 208, § 5; 1948, ch. 126, § 4; 1950, ch. 190, § 6; 1954, ch. 153, § 7; 1962, ch. 62, § 16; 1966, ch. 139, § 13; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(2), (9); 1976, ch. 133, § 14; 1976, ch. 366, § 2; 1980, ch. 229, § 1, effective January 1, 1983; 1986, ch. 86, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 429, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 296, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 498, § 5, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 221, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 2000, ch. 180, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 50, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2015 ch. 19, § 40, effective June 24, 2015; 2021 ch. 53, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

186.240.
Cabinet to furnish forms and plates — Records — Receipts — Reflectorized license plate program fund — Use of receipts — Accounting by clerk — Audit. [Effective January 1, 2024]

It shall be the duty of the cabinet to carry out the provisions of KRS

186.005

to

186.260

, and:

Provide to the clerk in each county access to all forms provided for in KRS

186.005

to

186.260

;

Keep a numerical record of all registration numbers issued in the state and also keep a record of motor or vehicle identification numbers required by KRS

186.160

;

Furnish to each clerk, originally each year upon estimate, and thereafter upon requisition at all times, a sufficient supply of standard, noncommercial plates and the supplies necessary to provide evidence of registration for all classes of vehicles required to be registered; and

Prescribe a plate of practical form and size for police identification purposes that shall contain:

The registration identifier;

An indication that Kentucky is the issuing jurisdiction;

For standard plates for noncommercial vehicles, the county in which the plate is issued;

For plates for commercial vehicles, the year the license expires and words or information the Department of Vehicle Regulation may prescribe by administrative regulation, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A; and

At the discretion of the cabinet, a state slogan.

Except as provided in KRS

186A.127

, license plates issued pursuant to this chapter shall conform to the provisions of subsection (1)(c) and (d) of this section. The Transportation Cabinet shall provide for the issuance of reflectorized plates for all motor vehicles, and shall collect a fee, in addition to the fee set out in KRS Chapter 186 and KRS

281.631

, of fifty cents ($0.50). The fifty cents ($0.50) fee to reflectorize license plates shall be used by the cabinet as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

The reflectorized license plate program fund is established in the state road fund and appropriated on a continual basis to the cabinet to administer the moneys as provided in this subsection. The fifty cents ($0.50) fee collected by the cabinet to reflectorize license plates shall be deposited into the program fund and used to issue reflectorized license plates. If at the end of a fiscal year, money remains in the program fund, it shall be retained in the fund and shall not revert to the state road fund. The interest and income earned on money in the program fund shall also be retained in the program fund to carry out the provisions of this subsection. The Transportation Cabinet shall issue reflectorized license plates under the provisions of this subsection on a schedule to be determined at the discretion of the cabinet.

Except as directed under subsection (3) of this section, the Transportation Cabinet shall receive all moneys forwarded by the clerk in each county and turn it over to the State Treasurer for the benefit of the state road fund.

The Transportation Cabinet shall require an accounting by the clerk in each county for any moneys received by him or her under the provisions of this chapter, after the deduction of his or her fees under this chapter, and for all receipts, forms, plates, and insignia consigned to him or her. The Auditor of Public Accounts, pursuant to KRS

43.071

, shall annually audit each county clerk concerning his or her responsibilities for the collection of various fees and taxes associated with motor vehicles. The secretary of the Transportation Cabinet, with the advice, consultation, and approval of the Auditor, shall develop and implement an inventory and accounting system which shall insure that the audits mandated in KRS

43.071

are performed in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards. The Transportation Cabinet shall pay for the audits mandated by KRS 43.071.

When applied for under KRS

186.060

or

186.061

, motor or vehicle numbers assigned shall be distinctive to show that they were designated by the cabinet.

HISTORY:

2739g-63: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 78, §§ 6, 11; 1946, ch. 208, § 5; 1948, ch. 126, § 4; 1950, ch. 190, § 6; 1954, ch. 153, § 7; 1962, ch. 62, § 16; 1966, ch. 139, § 13; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(2), (9); 1976, ch. 133, § 14; 1976, ch. 366, § 2; 1980, ch. 229, § 1, effective January 1, 1983; 1986, ch. 86, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 429, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 296, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 498, § 5, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 221, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 2000, ch. 180, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 50, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2015 ch. 19, § 40, effective June 24, 2015; 2021 ch. 53, § 2, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 18, § 15, effective January 1, 2024.

186.245.
Posting of notice about 2006 increases in fees of county clerks.

Beginning January 1, 2007, every county clerk shall post a permanent notice that the fee increases contained in 2006 Ky. Acts ch. 255 were requested by the Kentucky County Clerks Association. The notice shall be printed in bold face type of sufficient point size to be read from a distance of at least three (3) feet. The notice shall be posted in a conspicuous place to ensure that every person who enters the county clerk’s office will readily see the notice.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 428, § 36, effective July 15, 1994; 2006, ch. 255, § 2, effective January 1, 2007.

186.250.
Courts to notify department of convictions. [Repealed.]

186.260.
Arrests and bail for violations.

KRS

281.765

shall apply in the case of arrests and bail for a violation of any of the provisions of KRS

186.020

to

186.260

.

History.

2739g-64.

186.270.
City license taxes on trucks, tractors and trailers — Notice of new or increased tax.

Cities may, by ordinance, impose license taxes on motor trucks, truck-tractors, semitrailers and trailers and require that registration plates issued as evidence of the licenses be affixed to the vehicle in some conspicuous place as prescribed by ordinance. No new or increased license tax on motor trucks, truck-tractors, semitrailers and trailers shall be effective unless the owners thereof or licensees are mailed notice of the new tax at least ten (10) days prior to the effective date of the tax.

History.

2739g-92: amend. Acts 1964, ch. 119, § 1.

186.275.
Motor vehicle not to be registered without proof of payment of state and county taxes. [Repealed.]

186.276.
Seat tax on airport shuttle vehicles. [Repealed.]

186.280.
Motor vehicle not to be registered without proof of payment of city taxes. [Repealed.]

186.281.
Seat and other vehicle taxes. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 139, § 21; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(2); 1978, ch. 232, § 14, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 151, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 198, § 4, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 448, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; repealed by 2015 ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.

Compiler's Notes.

This section (Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 139, § 21; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(2); 1978, ch. 232, § 14, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 151, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 198, § 4, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 448, § 2, effective July 15, 1994) was repealed by Acts 2015, ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015).

186.285.
Requirements of KRS 186.275 and 186.280 to be additional to other motor vehicle registration requirements. [Repealed.]

186.286.
Apportionment of seat taxes. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 139, § 24; 1984, ch. 151, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; repealed by 2015 ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.

Compiler's Notes.

This section (Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 139, § 24; 1984, ch. 151, § 3, effective July 13, 1984) was repealed by Acts 2015, ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015).

186.290.
Information on motor vehicle emissions test status and compliance.

The Department of Vehicle Regulation shall provide and receive information on the emissions test status of vehicles registered in the Commonwealth of Kentucky. The Department of Vehicle Regulation shall provide appropriate emissions test and compliance status to the Department of Information Systems for inclusion in the AVIS database.

Upon notification to the Department of Vehicle Regulation from a county air pollution control district or the Energy and Environment Cabinet of expiration of a vehicle emissions compliance certificate, the Department of Vehicle Regulation shall immediately notify the person who owns the vehicle that unless evidence of compliance is received within thirty (30) days, the department shall revoke the registration of the motor vehicle until:

The person presents an emissions certificate to the county clerk and pays the reinstatement fee required under KRS

186.180

; or

The person presents proof in the form of an affidavit stating, under penalty of perjury as set forth in KRS

523.030

, that failure to obtain a current emissions certificate is the result of the inoperable condition of the motor vehicle.

The provisions of this section and KRS

186.180

,

186.990

,

224.20-760

, and

224.20-765

shall not prevent the Transportation Cabinet, a county air pollution district, or the Energy and Environment Cabinet from seeking the enforcement or operation of any other statute or ordinance that ensures the compliance of motor vehicles in the Commonwealth under KRS Chapter 186, KRS

224.20-710

to

224.20-765

, or KRS Chapter 77.

The provisions of this section and KRS

186.180

,

186.990

,

224.20-760

, and

224.20-765

shall apply to vehicles that are registered in a county authorized under KRS

224.20-710

to

224.20-765

or KRS Chapter 77 to conduct vehicle emissions tests.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 441, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 24, § 236, effective July 15, 2010.